src/morphology/affixes/noun.lexc
LEXICON kv6e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt6
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_AR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv7/3
kv7 ;
kv3 ;

LEXICON kv7 ! vørr
kv7e ;
kv_flt7 ;

LEXICON kv7e
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt7
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F_PLNA_AR ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv8 ! egg
kv8e ;
kv_flt8 ;

LEXICON kv8e
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt8
+N+Fem:       F_PLNA_AR ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv9/2
kv9 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv9 ! stong
kv9e ;
kv_flt9 ;

LEXICON kv9e
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA   S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt9
+N+Fem:%^eIUML F_PLNA_UR ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OA   F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv10 ! dorg
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv11 ! song
kv11e ;
kv_flt11 ;

LEXICON kv11e
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  S_F_SGGEN ;


LEXICON kv_flt11
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv12 ! bók
kv12e ;
kv_flt12 ;

LEXICON kv12e 
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv12f
kv_flt12 ;

LEXICON kv_flt12 
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv13 ! mørk
kv13e ;
kv_flt13 ;

LEXICON kv13e
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt13
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv14 ! nátt
kv14e ;
kv_flt14 ;

LEXICON kv14e
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt14
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_UR ; ! XXX one t, nætur
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv15 ! tonn
kv15e ;
kv_flt15 ;

LEXICON kv15e
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA  S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt15f
kv_flt15 ;

LEXICON kv_flt15
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_NULL ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv16 ! mús
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_NULL ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv17 ! mastur
kv17e ;
kv_flt17 ;

LEXICON kv17e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt17
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLNA_AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv18/17
kv18 ;
kv17 ;

LEXICON kv18 ! brúður
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^RDEL S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLNA_AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv19 ! fjøður
kv19e ;
kv_flt19 ;

LEXICON kv19e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt19f
kv_flt19f ;

LEXICON kv_flt19
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F_PLNA_AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv20 ! ær (only)
+N+Fem:ær S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:ær S_F_SGGEN_NULL ;
+N+Fem:ær F_PLNA_NULL ;
+N+Fem:ó F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:á F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv21 ! gjógv
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv22 ! klógv
kv22e ;
kv_flt22 ;

LEXICON kv22e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt22
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv23 ! trúgv
kv23e ;
kv_flt23 ;

LEXICON kv23e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt23
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv24/2
kv24 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv24/6
kv24 ;
kv6 ;

LEXICON kv24 ! kúgv
kv24e ;
kv_flt24 ;

LEXICON kv24e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt24f
kv_flt24 ;

LEXICON kv_flt24
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv25 ! gás
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv26 ! tá
kv26e ;
kv_flt26 ;

LEXICON kv26e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt26
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv27 ! rás
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv28 ! dyr
! kv28e ;
kv_flt28 ;

!LEXICON kv28e ! no ex
!# ;

LEXICON kv_flt28
+N+Fem+Pl:%^IUML F_PLNA_NULL ;
+N+Fem+Pl: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem+Pl: F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv29 ! móðir
+N+Fem+Sg:móð kv29e ;
+N+Fem+Pl:møð kv_flt29 ;


LEXICON kv29e 
+Nom:%>ir DF_N_SGf_S ;
+Acc:%>ur DF_A_SGf_S ;
+Dat:%>ur DF_D_SGf_S ;
+Gen:%>ur DF_G_SGf_S ;

LEXICON kv_flt29 
+Nom:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;
+Acc:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;
+Dat:r%>u DF_D_PL ;
+Gen:r%>a DF_G_PL ;

LEXICON kv30 ! dóttir
+N+Fem+Sg:dótt kv30e ;
+N+Fem+Pl:døt  kv_flt30 ;

LEXICON kv30e ! Remove for kv29e?
kv29e ;

LEXICON kv_flt30
kv_flt29 ;

LEXICON kv31 ! systir
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>ir DF_N_SGf_S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>ur DF_A_SGf_S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ur DF_D_SGf_S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ur DF_G_SGf_S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>rar DF_NA_PLf ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>rar DF_NA_PLf ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>rum DF_D_PL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ra DF_G_PL ;

LEXICON kv32 ! mýri
kv32e ;
kv_flt32 ;

LEXICON kv32e
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>i FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>i FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>i FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ar FINAL ;

LEXICON kv_flt32
+N+Fem+Pl+Nom:%>ar FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ar FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>um FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>a FINAL ;


LEXICON kv33 ! gleði
kv33e ;
kv_flt33 ;

LEXICON kv33e 
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: FINAL ;

LEXICON kv_flt33 
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>r FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>r FINAL ;

LEXICON kv34 ! kraft
kv34e;
kv_flt34 ;

LEXICON kv34e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt34 
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON h1 ! eyga
h1e ; !eyga
h_flt1 ;

LEXICON h1e
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_def ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_def ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGn ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>a DF_G_SGn_a ;

LEXICON h_flt1
+N+Neu: N_PLNA_u_ur ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG_na ;

LEXICON h2 ! hjarta
              h1e ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA_u_ur ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLG_na ;

LEXICON h3/5
h3 ;
h5 ;

LEXICON h3/22
h3 ;
h22 ;

LEXICON h3 ! orð
 h3e ;
 h_flt3 ;

LEXICON h3e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt3f
h_flt3 ;

LEXICON h_flt3
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h4/5
h4 ;
h5 ;

LEXICON h4 ! boð
 h4e ;
 h_flt4 ;

LEXICON h4e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGG ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ; 

LEXICON h_flt4
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD_0_U ; ! liðnum
!+N+Neu: N_PLD ;    ! liðunum, comment in if OK
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h5/3
h5 ;
h3 ;

LEXICON h5 ! barn
 h5e ;
 h_flt5 ;

LEXICON h5e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt5
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h6/4
h6 ;
h4 ;

LEXICON h6 ! lag
 h6e ;
 h_flt6 ;

LEXICON h6e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGG ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ; ! blaðinum
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD ; ! blaðnum XXX check

LEXICON h_flt6
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h7 ! bræv
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h8 ! land
 h8e ;
 h_flt8 ;

LEXICON h8e ! land
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt8 ! land
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h9/10
h9 ;
h10 ;

LEXICON h9 ! blikk
h9e ;
h_flt9 ;

LEXICON h9e 
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt9
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h10 ! fall
 h10e ;
 h_flt10 ;

LEXICON h10e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt10
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h11e/22f
h11e ;
h_flt22 ;

LEXICON h11 ! hús
h11e ;
h_flt11 ;

LEXICON h11e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt11
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h12 ! glas
h12e ;
h_flt12 ;

LEXICON h12e 
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
