src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
brúður kv18 ;
rás kv27 ;
dyr:dur kv28 ;
bræv h7 ;
andatrúgv kv23 ;
andnes h11e/22f ;
atdráttarkraft kv34 ;
avgrøði:avgrøði kv33 ;
baktá kv26 ;
barsilssong kv11e ;
ben h3/22 ;
blaðøksl kv7/3 ;
brotben h3/22 ;
bryggjutrom kv9/2 ;
brúðarsong:brúðarsongj kv11 ;
deyðasong kv11e ;
doktaranavnbót kv12 ;
dragdorg kv10 ;
dragusong:dragusongj kv11 ;
einkadóttir kv30 ;
ekrugás kv25 ;
farmabræv h5/3 ;
fiskavirking kv6e ;
fjallabrúður kv18/17 ;
fjalltrom kv9/2 ;
fjáltur kv19e ;
fleirgudatrúgv kv23 ;
flet kv22 ;
fleyald h3/5 ;
flogfjøður kv19 ;
flogmús kv16 ;
flutningsband h8 ;
fløðufall h10e ;
fordekk h9 ;
fosturmóðir:fostur kv29 ;
frammastur kv17 ;
fremstatá kv26 ;
fríggjanátt kv14 ;
fuglakrógv kv21 ;
fuglaljóð h4 ;
fuglavað h6/4 ;
fyrstadrekka:fyrstadrekk h1e ;
fárasmør h3e ;
fís h11 ;
fútabann:fútabann h9e ;
galtartonn kv15 ;
gandakraft kv34 ;
garðær:garð kv20 ;
gersimi:gersim kv32 ;
gníggital h5 ;
greivafrú kv24/2 ;
grindavás h11e ;
gron kv7 ;
grynnutrom kv9/2 ;
grótbrúgv kv24/6 ;
grótflógv kv21 ;
grótslag h6 ;
grøði kv33 ;
gudsfrøði kv33e ;
gágguskel:gágguskelj kv8 ;
gás kv25 ;
hagamús kv16 ;
halgabók kv12e ;
hallardyr:hallardur kv28 ;
handilsbark h5e ;
havbrúgv kv24e ;
havbrún kv24 ;
havgron kv7e ;
havnarfólk:havnarfólk h3 ;
heimafleyg h4e ;
hellurók kv12 ;
hellustrond kv9 ;
hentleikaflagg h10 ;
hestabak h4/5 ;
hjartarfrúgv kv24e ;
hoyben h3/22 ;
hugsanarlag h6e ;
hundabrúður kv18/17 ;
hundsbrúður kv18/17 ;
hundsoyra:hundsoyr h1 ;
hvassagras h12 ;
hálsaband h8 ;
hálvsystir:hálvsyst kv31 ;
húsfrú kv24/2 ;
illtrúgv kv23e ;
innangarðsmørk kv13 ;
innivist kv11e ;
jarðgimbur kv17 ;
kalsbræv h5/3 ;
kalsdóttir kv30 ;
kastidorg kv10 ;
kavaroksnátt kv14 ;
kennarafrúgv kv24/6 ;
kirnuskinn:kirnuskinn h9 ;
klapp h9/10 ;
kletstrom kv9/2 ;
klippingsfjall h10 ;
kloddabrøkur kv12f ;
klyv:klyvj kv8 ;
klædnatilfar h3e ;
knugg h9e ;
kongsgóðs h11e ;
kotabak h4/5 ;
kovasong:kovasongj kv11 ;
kropsbygging kv6e ;
kropslús kv16 ;
krákuhjarta:krákuhjart h2 ;
kvinnulið h4 ;
kyrringarhús h11 ;
kálvahjarta:kálvahjart h2 ;
kálvamóðir:kálva kv29 ;
lagsmansbyrði:lagsmansbyrð kv32 ;
lambstonn kv15 ;
land h8e ;
lepafit:lepafitj kv8 ;
letisúgv kv24 ;
leðurrógv kv22e ;
ljóstøkni kv33e ;
ljóðvarp:ljóðvarp h5 ;
lofnaklógv kv22 ;
lomvigareyga:lomvigareyg h1 ;
losær:los kv20 ;
lógvaklapp h9/10 ;
manilla h1e ;
mannahond kv9 ;
mannasamfelag h6 ;
mannfall h10e ;
manstur kv17 ;
matarbót kv12e ;
mathald h3/5 ;
metan h4e ;
metingarbók:metingarbók kv12 ;
midnátt kv14e ;
mislag h6e ;
miðlingasystir:miðlingasyst kv31 ;
miðnátt kv14e ;
mon kv7 ;
morgungron kv7e ;
murtl h3 ;
móðurdóttir kv30 ;
mørk kv13 ;
nakkafjøður kv19 ;
nes h11e/22f ;
neyðsyn kv8e ;
nævur kv17e ;
ovurtal h5e ;
oyðimørk kv13 ;
peglaglas h12 ;
perlumóðir kv29e ;
pátrúgv kv23e ;
renturokning kv6e ;
rimasong:rimasongj kv11 ;
risaklapp h9/10 ;
rokkahjarta:rokkahjart h2 ;
roysningstonn kv15 ;
roðbrøkur kv12f ;
runddorg kv10 ;
róðurkraft kv34 ;
røktingarlamb h8 ;
røtugás kv25 ;
seyðalivur kv17 ;
seyðalús kv16 ;
seyðamørk kv13 ;
seyðspell h9 ;
sildavað h6/4 ;
skiparaskel:skiparaskelj kv8 ;
skrivibók kv12 ;
skuldarbræv h5/3 ;
skíggjastong kv9 ;
skírhósnátt kv14 ;
soda h1e ;
soppmóðir kv29 ;
soð h4e ;
sperðilsgørn kv7 ;
steinaldin h3e ;
styrki kv33 ;
stólbak h4/5 ;
stórasystir:stórasyst kv31 ;
stóratá kv26 ;
stýrifjøður kv19 ;
sundurbróting kv6e ;
svartagler h3 ;
sálarbót kv12e ;
sálargrand h8e ;
sólbrúður kv18/17 ;
sóttarsong kv11e ;
súgv kv24 ;
súgv kv24e ;
tannhald h3/5 ;
tekk h9e ;
tilhall h10e ;
tjaldursflagg h10 ;
tong kv9 ;
trælalógv kv21 ;
trúarbót kv12e ;
trúgv kv23 ;
tvæveturær:tvævetur kv20 ;
tvítonn kv15 ;
tíðartonn kv15e ;
tíðindatos h11e ;
tóvaraklógv kv22 ;
umtal h5e ;
ungfrú kv24/2 ;
uppátrúgv kv23e ;
upsadorg kv10 ;
varsemi kv33e ;
vatnoyri:vatnoyr kv32 ;
vatnsopaeyga:vatnsopaeyg h1 ;
vað h6/4 ;
veggjagras h12 ;
vegøksl kv7/3 ;
verkskeið h4 ;
vágsmóðir kv29e ;
vøkunátt kv14 ;
yvirbrøkur kv12f ;
Írland h8e ;
ástarbragd h5 ;
æður kv18 ;
ílag:ílag h6 ;
ísbrúgv kv24/6 ;
íshús h11 ;
ísmalagørn kv7 ;
ólag h6e ;
øksl kv7/3 ;
útnes h11e/22f ;
